Illinois, session 104th, HB4529.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 11-4.2 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/11-4.2)  (from Ch. 46, par. 11-4.2)7    Sec. 11-4.2. (a) Except as otherwise provided in 8subsection (b) all polling places shall be accessible to 9voters with disabilities and elderly voters, as determined by 10rule of the State Board of Elections, and each polling place 11shall include at least one voting booth that is wheelchair 12accessible. 13    (b) Subsection (a) of this Section shall not apply to a 14polling place (1) in the case of an emergency, as determined by 15the State Board of Elections; or (2) if the State Board of 16Elections (A) determines that all potential polling places 17have been surveyed and no such accessible place is available, 18nor is the election authority able to make one accessible; and 19(B) assures that any voter with a disability or elderly voter 20assigned to an inaccessible polling place, upon advance 21request of such voter (pursuant to procedures established by 22rule of the State Board of Elections) will be provided with an 23alternative means for casting a ballot on the day of the   HB4529- 2 -LRB104 16952 SPS 30366 b1election or will be assigned to an accessible polling place.2    (c) No later than December 31 of each even numbered year, 3the State Board of Elections shall report to the General 4Assembly and the Federal Election Commission the number of 5accessible and inaccessible polling places in the State on the 6date of the next preceding general election, and the reasons 7for any instance of inaccessibility.8(Source: P.A. 102-668, eff. 11-15-21.)